Utah statutes.
19-8-111.   Certificate of completion.

(1)  If the executive director determines that an applicant has completed a voluntary cleanup in accordance with the agreement entered into under this chapter, the executive director shall within 30 days after the determination issue to the applicant a certificate of completion.

(2)  The certificate of completion shall:

(a)  acknowledge the protection from liability provided by Section 19-8-113;

(b)  state the proposed future use of the property as defined under the voluntary cleanup agreement;

(c)  provide a legal description of the property and identify the owner of the property; and

(d)  state the applicant has complied with the voluntary cleanup agreement and has met the requirements of Sections 19-8-108 and 19-8-110.

(3)  The executive director shall upon issuance of the certificate of completion record a copy in the real property records of the county in which the site is located.



Enacted by Chapter 247, 1997 General Session

